Idaho, session 2025, H0462.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 63-3022I, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-3022I. ADOPTION AND EMBRYO EXPENSES. For taxable years commencing
on or after January 1, 2018, legal fees and costs and medical expenses and
costs all related to the adoption of a child may be deducted from taxable
income by adoptive parents. The deduction allowed pursuant to this section
shall not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for the legal fees and costs
and medical expenses and costs incurred in the adoption, or the actual costs
of the legal fees and costs and medical expenses and costs incurred in the
adoption, whichever amount is less, which amount may not include travel
costs. The deduction allowed pursuant to this section shall also apply to
legal fees and medical expenses related to the acquisition and transfer into
the human body of a donated embryo that results in a live birth; in such case,
the deduction shall be taken in the tax year that the live birth occurs and
any legal fees and medical expenses related to the acquisition and transfer
of the donated embryo for the three (3) years immediately preceding the live
birth may be deducted.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval, and retroactively to January 1, 2025.